src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v4_3la  !!≈ * **@CODE@** varjela:varjel
+V+Inf:^WG%>^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:e%>ss^A K ;
!+V+InfMa:e 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>%^HMET2mh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>mh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:e%>m^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+InfMa+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^HMET2%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>%h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee x3_oblique ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^HMET2%>hee x3_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:%>t^U x3_oblique ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:e%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:e%>v^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Av^A K ; 
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Av^At K ; 

+V+Pass+Cond:%>i4si K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:e # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>v^A K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>v^At K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3v^A K ;

+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4s%>im^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:emi xnen ;

LEXICON v4_4lla  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Inf:^WG%>l^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>l^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:e%>ss^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>%^HMET2mh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>mh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:e%>m^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+InfMa+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;


+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^HMET2%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%^N^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>heet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^HMET2%>heet K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:^WG%>t^U x3_oblique ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:e%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:%>t^Uv^A x3_oblique ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Uv^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Uv^At K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>i4si K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:e # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>v^A K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>v^At K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3v^A K ;

+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%i4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:emi xnen ;







LEXICON v5 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  kehitä:kehi  
+V+Inf:t%>^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:t^A%>kse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:t%>^Aen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:t%>^Aess^A K ;
+V+InfMa:%>tt^A 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>tt^Ahmaan K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>tt^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>t^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:t%>t^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee x3_oblique ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^N^HMET2%>heet K ; !HÄR 3 ggr tarvihneet
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>hneet K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:t%>tee x3_oblique ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>tev^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:t%>t^Uv^A x3 ;

+V+Pass+Cond:t%>i4si K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:tte # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:t%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:t%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:t%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ttee K ; ! fix
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:t%>^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:t%>^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:t%>^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:t%>^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:t%>^Amme K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:t%>^Atte K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:t%>^Av^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:t%>^Av^At K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:s%>in K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:s%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:s%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:s%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond:t%>^A%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:t%>^A%>i4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:t%>^A%>i4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:t%>^A%>i4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:t%>^Ami xnen ;



LEXICON v6 !!≈ * **@CODE@** =  paeta:pake
+V+Inf:^WG%>t^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>t^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:^WG%>t^Aen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:^WG%>t^Aess^A K ;
!+V+InfMa:%>nem^A 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa:ne 3infcase ; !CHECK vilken är rätt??
+V+InfMa+Ill:ne%>m^HMET2h^A^An K ; ! 

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG%>t^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>ni4si K ;


+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^Nhee x3_oblique ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^N^HMET2heet K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:n%>ev^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:^WGt%>t^Av^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>tt^Ut K ;


+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:^WG%>t^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>t^Akh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:^WG%>t^Akh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:^WG%>t^A%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ne%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ne%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ne%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ne%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ne%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ne%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ne%>v^At K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:n%>in K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:n%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:n%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:n%>im^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:n%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:n%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:n%>i3v^A K ;

+V+Act+Cond:%>ni4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ni4s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>ni4s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>ni4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Der+Der/minen+N:nemi xnen ;


!! ## Subparadigms
!! ### Conditional forms

LEXICON 2cond !!≈ **@CODE@** kehitä:kehi  
+Sg1:%>in K ; ! 
+Sg2:%>it K ;
+Sg3: K ;
!+Sg3:%>i K ; !CHECK! Not for v3_j iaf
+Pl1:%>imm^A K ;
+Pl2:%>itt^A K ;
+Pl3:%>iv^A K ;
+Pl3:%>it K ;

!LEXICON 2cond_m !!≈ **@CODE@** for -im^A  
!+Sg1:%>in K ; ! 
!+Sg2:%>it K ;
!+Sg3: K ;
!+Pl1:%>im^A K ;
!+Pl2:%>itt^A K ;
!+Pl3:%>iv^A K ;
!+Pl3:%>it K ;




!! ### Infinitive paradigms

LEXICON 3infcase
+Ill:%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Ade:%>m^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;


!! from fkv

LEXICON x3_obli 
!+Sg+Nom:       PxK ;
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;

!LEXICON v12pers_long
! +Pl1:%>mm^A K ; !
! v12pers ;

LEXICON v12pers_short
 +Pl1:%>m^A K ;
 v12pers ;

LEXICON v12pers !!≈ @CODE@ Only sg12, pl12 so far
 +Sg1:%>n K ;
 +Sg2:%>t K ;
 +Pl2:%>tt^A K ;



LEXICON PRFPRC_OBL !!≈ @CODE@ is without nom sg from fkv


! obl_strong_odd ;
! +Sg:%>i2 com ;
! +Pl:%>i2 com ;
!weak_v_stem ;
+Sg+Par:^U%>tt^A K ;
!:hee x_32_et_ts_common ;
!+Sg+Ill:hee ill_sseen    ;
!+Pl+Gen:hee%>i2 gen_tten ;
+Pl+Com:hee%>i2ne K ;
!!+Err/Orth:ee x_32_et_ts_common ;
!+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ee ill_sseen    ;
!+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ee%>i2 gen_tten ;
!+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ee%>i2ne K ;
