src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
roijela:roijel v4_3la ;
mairiskela:mairiskel v4_3la ;
valela:valel v4_3la ;
kannela:kannel v4_3la ;
latela:latel v4_3la ;
otela:ottel v4_3la ;
kastela:kastel v4_3la ;
taistela:taistel v4_3la ;
nostela:nostel v4_3la ;
arvela:arvel v4_3la ;
nuhjaila:nuhjail v4_3la ;
orjaila:orjail v4_3la ;
paikkaila:paikkail v4_3la ;
kerskaila:kerskail v4_3la ;
leukaila:leuk2ail v4_3la ;
kellaila:kellail v4_3la ;
praamaila:praamail v4_3la ;
lainaila:lainail v4_3la ;
kaipaila:kaipail v4_3la ;
kauppaila:kaupp2ail v4_3la ;
vieraila:vierail v4_3la ;
luuraila:luurail v4_3la ;
kehtaila:kehtail v4_3la ;
kiistaila:kiistail v4_3la ;
kiivaila:kiivail v4_3la ;
kokkeila:kokkeil v4_3la ;
oleila:oleil v4_3la ;
uhkaila:uhkail v4_3la ;
makoila:makoil v4_3la ;
makkoila:makkoil v4_3la ;
rukkoila:rukkoil v4_3la ;
liukoila:liukoil v4_3la ;
kirroila:kirroil v4_3la ;
koukkuila:koukkuil v4_3la ;
kirppuila:kirppuil v4_3la ;
kittuila:kitt2uil v4_3la ;
nutkahella:nutkahtel v4_4lla ;
varjella:varjel v4_4lla ;
tuuleskella:tuuleskel v4_4lla ;
painiskella:painiskel v4_4lla ;
piiskoskella:piiskoskel v4_4lla ;
karvoskella:karvoskel v4_4lla ;
torkuskella:torkuskel v4_4lla ;
nukella:nukkel v4_4lla ;
kannella:kantel v4_4lla ;
laverrella:lavertel v4_4lla ;
puiketella:puikettel v4_4lla ;
puretella:purettel v4_4lla ;
laitella:laittel v4_4lla ;
onnitella:onnittel v4_4lla ;
kursitella:kursittel v4_4lla ;
maaskentella:maaskenttel v4_4lla ;
kouhotella:kouhottel v4_4lla ;
kiskotella:kiskottel v4_4lla ;
pallotella:pallottel v4_4lla ;
varotella:varottel v4_4lla ;
puotella:puottel v4_4lla ;
punertella:punert2el v4_4lla ;
viekastella:viekastel v4_4lla ;
mellastella:mellastel v4_4lla ;
viisastella:viisastel v4_4lla ;
kuvastella:kuvastel v4_4lla ;
kalistella:kalistel v4_4lla ;
onnistella:onnistel v4_4lla ;
muistella:muistel v4_4lla ;
kehnostella:kehnostel v4_4lla ;
maustella:maustel v4_4lla ;
matkustella:matkustel v4_4lla ;
tunnustella:tunnustel v4_4lla ;
visustella:visustel v4_4lla ;
laavustella:laavustel v4_4lla ;
keikutella:keikuttel v4_4lla ;
lauskutella:lauskuttel v4_4lla ;
knaputella:knaputtel v4_4lla ;
kostutella:kostuttel v4_4lla ;
maijailla:maijail v4_4lla ;
lonkoilla:lonkoil v4_4lla ;
kuola:kuol v4_3la ;
luula:luul v4_3la ;
paeta:pae v6 ;
langeta:lange v6 ;
paheta:pahe v6 ;
vanheta:vanhe v6 ;
roheta:rohe v6 ;
oieta:oie v6 ;
laajeta:laaje v6 ;
puhjeta:puhje v6 ;
muiijeta:muiije v6 ;
muijeta:muije v6 ;
valjeta:valje v6 ;
karjeta:karje v6 ;
lujeta:luje v6 ;
nalketa:nalkke v6 ;
posketa:poske v6 ;
ratketa:ratke v6 ;
vaaleta:vaale v6 ;
tuuleta:tuule v6 ;
julmeta:julme v6 ;
ummeta:umme v6 ;
varmeta:varme v6 ;
kuumeta:kuume v6 ;
mureta:mure v6 ;
musteta:muste v6 ;
laueta:lauke v6 ;
poueta:pouke v6 ;
tueta:tuke v6 ;
laveta:lave v6 ;
kalveta:kalve v6 ;
koveta:kove v6 ;
ruveta:ruve v6 ;
vanhaita:vanhai v5 ;
ansaita:ansai v5 ;
fangita:fangi v5 ;
tohita:tohi v5 ;
kuohita:kuohi v5 ;
karhiita:karhii v5 ;
palkita:palki v5 ;
parkita:parki v5 ;
valita:vali v5 ; ! xxx
talita:tali v5 ;
hallita:halli v5 ;
kallita:kalli v5 ;
mullita:mulli v5 ;
solmita:solmi v5 ;
tuomita:tuomi v5 ;
mainita:maini v5 ;
punnita:punni v5 ;
mutikoita:mutikoi v5 ;
ateroita:ateroi v5 ;
kaupita:kaupi v5 ;
kaarita:kaari v5 ;
vaatita:vaati v5 ;
tarvita:tarvi v5 ;
nielä:niel v4_3la ;
lienelä:lienel v4_3la ;
piirelä:piirel v4_3la ;
petelä:pettel v4_3la ;
niitelä:niitel v4_3la ;
näytelä:näyttel v4_3la ;
myöelä:myöel v4_3la ;
kääreilä:kääreil v4_3la ;
hymmyilä:hymmyil v4_3la ;
läijäilä:läijäil v4_3la ;
hyrräilä:hyrräil v4_3la ;
mettäilä:mett2äil v4_3la ;
lämmähellä:lämmähel v4_4lla ;
nirviskellä:nirviskel v4_4lla ;
vietellä:viettel v4_4lla ;
vieritellä:vierittel v4_4lla ;
kestellä:kestel v4_4lla ;
vilpistellä:vilpistel v4_4lla ;
irvistellä:irvistel v4_4lla ;
lähätellä:lähättel v4_4lla ;
vishetä:vishe v6 ;
löyhetä:löyhe v6 ;
vähetä:vähe v6 ;
liietä:liie v6 ;
kehjetä:kehke v6 ;
iljetä:ilke v6 ;
mäljetä:mälke v6 ;
heiketä:heikke v6 ;
jyrketä:jyrkke v6 ;
pehmetä:pehme v6 ;
ilmetä:ilme v6 ;
lemmetä:lempe v6 ;
kiinetä:kiine v6 ;
lievetä:lieve v6 ;
levetä:leve v6 ;
kiivetä:kiive v6 ;
kliivetä:kliive v6 ;
pilvetä:pilve v6 ;
kyetä:kyke v6 ;
kehitä:kehi v5 ;
vihitä:vihi v5 ;
liekitä:lieki v5 ;
leikitä:leiki v5 ;
tilkitä:tilki v5 ;
pälkitä:pälki v5 ;
kenkitä:kenki v5 ;
merkitä:merki v5 ;
hillitä:hilli v5 ;
villitä:villi v5 ;
pehmitä:pehmi v5 ;
pimitä:pimi v5 ;
vilmitä:vilmi v5 ;
lämmitä:lämmi v5 ;
fiinitä:fiini v5 ;
kiepitä:kiepi v5 ;
vieritä:vieri v5 ;
keritä:keri v5 ;
häiritä:häiri v5 ;
vihtitä:vihti v5 ;
lititä:liti v5 ;
ristitä:risti v5 ;
kyytitä:kyyti v5 ;
kevitä:kevi v5 ;
levitä:levi v5 ;
selvitä:selvi v5 ;
metelöitä:metelöi v5 ;
ajatella:ajattel v4_4lla ;
